Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2164.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5895XS (2) 91 sc/js S.F. 2164 Section 1. Section 26.2, subsection 3, paragraph b, 1 subparagraph (5), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 (5) Construction , equipment, or repair or maintenance 3 work performed for a city utility under chapter 388 when such 4 work is performed by its employees , relates to an electric 5 generation or transmission project, or when such work relates 6 to existing utility infrastructure or establishing connections 7 to existing utility infrastructure. For purposes of this 8 subparagraph, âutility infrastructureâ includes facilities used 9 for the storage, collection, disposal, treatment, generation, 10 transmission, or distribution of water, sewage, waste, 11 electricity, gas, or telecommunications service. 12